Utah statutes.
10-8-18.   Acquisition of water sources -- Retainage.

(1)  They may construct, purchase or lease and maintain canals, ditches, artesian wells and reservoirs, may appropriate, purchase or lease springs, streams or sources of water supply for the purpose of providing water for irrigation, domestic or other useful purposes; may prevent all waste of water flowing from artesian wells, and if necessary to secure sources of water supply, may purchase or lease land; they may also purchase, acquire or lease stock in canal companies and water companies for the purpose of providing water for the city and the inhabitants thereof.

(2)  If any payment on a contract with a private person, firm, or corporation to construct canals, ditches, artesian wells, or reservoirs is retained or withheld, it shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.



Amended by Chapter 365, 1999 General Session

